Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2114
Counties and municipalities; contract between themselves.

In order to achieve the efficiencies and economics resulting from unified operations, the Legislature encourages the counties and municipalities to make use of the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act by contracting between and among themselves for cooperative programs of administering all phases of their road and street programs.

Laws 1969, c. 312, § 14, p. 1124;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 72;

Laws 2019, LB82, § 6.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.